Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20218-1,143
Controllable electronic records; courts; jurisdiction.

The courts of Nebraska shall have jurisdiction to hear claims in both law and equity relating to controllable electronic records, including those arising under sections 8-1,141 to 8-1,143 and the Uniform Commercial Code.

Laws 2021, LB649, § 42.
October 1, 2021